Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1276.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CARTS TO CAREERS.new text end new text begin $750,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $750,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for grants to the Minnesota Grocers Association Foundation for Carts to Careers, a statewide initiative to promote careers in the food industry, conduct outreach, provide job skills training, and award scholarships for students pursuing careers in the food industry. The amount may also be used for training and development costs, certifications, and other activities aimed at strengthening the workforce pipeline in the food retail sector. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end